Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1809
Livestock lanes; establishment; maintenance; powers of county board.

In the establishment and maintenance of such lanes and driveways the county board shall have the same powers and follow the same procedure as is provided by law for the establishment and maintenance of public roads and highways, except as to bridges, culverts and the grading of such lanes and driveways.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 9, p. 554.